Hawaii, session 2026, GM1325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that hearing loss is a
significant public health concern that affects individuals of
all ages, from keiki to kupuna. National and state-level data
indicate that tens of thousands of Hawaii residents experience
some degree of hearing loss, including many who report serious
hearing difficulty or deafness. Hearing loss becomes
increasingly common with age, affecting roughly one-third of
adults in their sixties, a majority of adults in their
seventies, and most adults in their eighties.
The legislature further finds that despite the prevalence
of hearing loss, it remains widely underdiagnosed and
undertreated. Although newborn hearing screenings are in place,
Hawaii lacks a coordinated statewide approach to screening and
follow-up for school-age children and adults. Primary care
providers often receive limited training and reimbursement
incentives to screen for hearing loss, hearing aids and
assistive devices remain prohibitively expensive for many
2026-3431 HB1974 GDI HMSO 1
iMiHiiiiiiiMniiiinii

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
residents, and pathways to diagnosis and treatment are
frequently fragmented and difficult to navigate. Untreated
hearing loss increases risk of cognitive decline and dementia,
falls, social isolation and mental health issues, reduced
workforce participation, caregiver burden, and costly
institutional care. There is critical need for a coordinated
statewide strategy to address these medical, social,
educational, and economic impacts.
The purpose of this Act is to require the state health
planning and development agency to develop a comprehensive state
plan on hearing loss focused on improving access, affordability,
awareness, and early detection of hearing loss in collaboration
with community stakeholders, relevant advisory boards, and state
agencies.
SECTION 2. Chapter 323D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§323D- State plan on hearing loss. (a) The state
agency shall develop and publish a state plan on hearing loss.
The state plan on hearing loss shall include but not be limited
to:
2026-3431 HB1974 CDl HMSO
iiiMiiiiBUiiiniin

Page 3 1974
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(1) An assessment of current policies^ efforts, and
initiatives addressing hearing loss in the State;
(2) Epidemiological data on hearing loss in the State,
including prevalence by age group, geographic area,
and socioeconomic status;
(3) An analysis of public awareness and social perception
of hearing loss;
(4) The identification of’gaps in screening and early
detection for school-age children, adults, and the
elderly;
(5) Information on access to care and treatment, including
hearing aids, cochlear implants, and audiological
services;
(6) Information on workforce development and training for
primary care providers, educators, and hearing health
professionals;
(7) The identification of associated health concerns,
including cognitive decline, dementia, mental health
impacts, fall risk, and communication barriers;
(8) Recommendations for improving access to services, the
affordability of assistive technologies, and the
2026-3431 HB1974 CDl HMSO

■IIHMIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIII

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
availability of communication supports, including
state policy suggestions; and
(9) Recommendations for pilot or demonstration projects to
expand hearing screening, tele-audiology access, and
community-based outreach.
(b) In developing the state plan on hearing loss, the
state agency may consult with pertinent stakeholders, including:
(1) Community-based organizations serving individuals with
hearing loss;
(2) Health care providers, audiologists, and speech­
language pathologists; and
(3) Individuals experiencing hearing loss.
(c) The state agency shall publish and submit an initial
state plan on hearing loss to the legislature no later than
twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of
2027.
(d) No later than twenty days prior to the convening of
the regular session of 2029 and each odd-numbered regular
session thereafter, the state agency shall submit an update
report on the state plan on hearing loss covering the most
recently completed fiscal biennium. The update report shall
2026-3431 HB1974 CDl HMSO
inilllillililHIHIM

Page 5
H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
include information on progress made toward the goals of the
state plan on hearing loss. In addition, each update report
sha]J^3UT^lud^
(1) An implementation work plan specifying the tasks,
timelines, and milestones for each goal;
(2) Efforts taken by the State to achieve the goals and
strategies identified in the most recent state plan on
hearing loss;
(3) Recommendations for state policy, program development,
or legislation relating to hearing loss and
communication access; and
(4) A review of services and initiatives coordinated among
public and private agencies to meet the needs of
individuals with hearing loss and their families."
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $100,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
state health planning and development agency to develop'and
publish the state plan on hearing loss, including:
2026-3431 HB1974 CDl HMSO

Page 6 II |k । 1974
H.B. NO.
hbi
C.D. 1
(1) Coordinating the development of the state plan on
hearing loss through project management and
interagency collaboration;
(2) Engaging stakeholders statewide, including kupuna,
health care providers, educators, and community-based
organizations, to identify needs, gaps, and
opportunities;
(3) Consulting with experts and technical advisors in
hearing health, aging, and disability services to
inform plan recommendations; and
(4) Drafting, reviewing, and publishing the state plan on
hearing loss for submission to the legislature.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the state health
planning and development agency for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3431 HB1974 CDl HMSO
HHiniiMmngMiiiiiiii

1974
H.B. NO.
I
w
o
b
o
b
APPROVED this 9th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1974, HD 1, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
---------
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1974, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
177-26